test/src/morphology/N-kalosh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kaloš: # Noun 143 'eng /est kaloss/fin' - full paradigm
     kaloš+N+Sg+Nom: kaloš
     kaloš+N+Sg+Gen: kaloš
     kaloš+N+Sg+Par: kalošõ
     kaloš+N+Sg+Dat: kalošõn
     kaloš+N+Sg+Ins: kalošõks
     kaloš+N+Sg+Ill: kalošõ
     kaloš+N+Sg+Ela: kalošõst
     kaloš+N+Pl+Nom: kalošõd
     kaloš+N+Pl+Gen: kalošõd
     kaloš+N+Pl+Par: kalošidi
     kaloš+N+Pl+Dat: kalošõdõn
     kaloš+N+Pl+Ins: kalošõdõks
     kaloš+N+Pl+Ill: kalošiz
     kaloš+N+Pl+Ela: kalošist
